Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1826.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; office of advanced air mobility; operations and support The sum of $500,000 is appropriated from the advanced air mobility fund established by section 28-8604, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the office of advanced air mobility for operations and support. Sec. 2. Conditional enactment This act does not become effective unless Senate Bill 1827, fifty-seventh legislature, second regular session, relating to aviation, becomes law.